zh-CN: 锯齿花边波幅: 婴儿/迷你; 巨型/特大号; 大号; 中号; 小号; 其他
fi: Rick rack -aallon koko: Baby/Mini; Jumbo/erittäin suuri; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Muu
pt-BR: Sianinha tamanho da onda: Bebê/Mini; Jumbo/Extra grande; Grande; Média; Pequena; Outro
sl-SI: Velikost valov cik-cak traku: Baby / mini; Jumbo / zelo veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Majhno; Drugo
pt-PT: Tamanho das ondulações do ric-rac: Bebé/mini; Jumbo/extra grande; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
fr: Taille des ondulations du croquet: Bébé/Mini; Jumbo/Très grand; Grand; Moyen; Petit; Autre
sv: Ric-rac – vågstorlek: Baby/Mini; Jumbo/Extra stor; Stor; Medium; Liten; Annat
ko: 리크랙 웨이브 사이즈: 베이비/미니; 점보/초대형; 대형; 중형; 소형; 기타
it: Taglia onda a zig-zag: Baby/mini; Jumbo/Extra large; Large; Medium; Small; Altro
zh-TW: 波浪飾帶波浪尺寸: 嬰兒/迷你; 特大/超大; 大; 中; 小; 其他
ja: リクラック波のサイズ: ベビー/ミニ; ジャンボ/特大; 大; 中; 小; その他
da: Zigzag-bølgestørrelse: Baby/mini; Jumbo/ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
nl: Zigzagband golfgrootte: Baby/mini; Jumbo/extra large; Groot; Medium; Klein; Overig
tr: Ric-rac dalga boyutu: Bebek/mini; Jumbo/ekstra büyük; Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
ru: Размер волны тесьмы зигзаг: Крошечная/мини; Гигантская/очень большая; Большая; Средняя; Маленькая; Другое
es: Tamaño de onda de la cinta ric-rac: Bebé/mini; Gigante/extragrande; Grande; Mediano; Pequeño; Otro
th: ขนาดคลื่นริค-แร็ก: เบบี้/มินิ; จัมโบ้/ใหญ่พิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Ric-rac bangelės dydis: Maža / mini; Milžiniška / ypač didelė; Didelė; Vidutinė; Maža; Kita
bg-BG: Размер на вълната на рик-рак лентата: Бебешки/мини; Джъмбо/много голям; Голям; Среден; Малък; Други
hu: Cikcakk szalag hullámmérete: Bébi/mini; Jumbo/extra nagy; Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
vi: Kích thước sóng Ric-rac: Siêu nhỏ/Mini; Khổng lồ/Cực lớn; Lớn; Trung bình; Nhỏ; Khác
pl: Rozmiar fali zygzaka: Mały/Mini; Jumbo/Bardzo duży; Duży; Średni; Mały; Inne
ro-RO: Dimensiunea onduleului panglicii ric-rac: Baby/Mini; Jumbo/Extra mare; Mare; Mediu; Mic; Altele
en: Ric-rac wave size: Baby/Mini; Jumbo/Extra large; Large; Medium; Small; Other
de: Wellengröße von Zackenlitze: Baby/Mini; Jumbo/Extragroß; Groß; Mittel; Klein; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Veľkosť vlnky Ric-rac: Detská/mini; Jumbo/extra veľká; Veľká; Stredná; Malá; Iná
nb: Ric-rac-bølgestørrelse: Baby/mini; Jumbo / ekstra stor; Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
el: Μέγεθος κυματισμού Ric-rac: Baby/Μίνι; Jumbo/Πολύ μεγάλο; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικρό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Veličina vala Ric-rac: Dječje/Mini; Jumbo/Ekstra veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Malo; Ostalo
cs: Velikost vlny Ric-rac: Baby/Mini; Jumbo / extra velká; Velká; Střední; Malá; Jiná